Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-908
State Treasurer; duties.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds and securities of the retirement system and may deposit the funds and securities in any financial institution approved by the Nebraska Investment Council. All disbursements therefrom shall be paid by him or her only upon vouchers signed by a person authorized by the retirement board. The State Treasurer shall transmit monthly to the board a detailed statement showing all credits to and disbursements from the funds in his or her custody belonging to the retirement system.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 6, p. 641;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2906;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 440, p. 843;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1506;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 543;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 13.